Florida, session 2026, HB411.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsections (46) and (47) of section 393.063,
Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (47) and (48),
respectively, subsection (11) is amended, and a new subsection
(46) is added to that section, to read:
393.063 Definitions.—For the purposes of this chapter, the
term:
(11) "Developmental disability" means a disorder or
syndrome that is attributable to intellectual disability,
cerebral palsy, autism, spina bifida, Down syndrome, Phelan-
McDermid syndrome, or Prader-Willi syndrome, or Tatton-Brown-
Rahman syndrome; that manifests before the age of 18; and that
constitutes a substantial handicap that can reasonably be
expected to continue indefinitely.
(46) "Tatton-Brown-Rahman syndrome" means a disorder
caused by a mutation in the DNMT3A gene typified by mild to
severe intellectual disability, macrocephaly, stature and weight
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb411-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 411 2026
that is greater than or equal to two or more standard deviations
above the mean for the person's age and sex, and any of the
following features presenting in infancy, childhood, or
adolescence:
(a) Mild facial dysmorphism.
(b) Joint hypermobility.
(c) Hypotonia.
(d) Kyphoscoliosis.
(e) Seizures.
(f) Cryptorchidism.
(g) Deficits in behavior.
(h) Hematologic malignancies.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb411-01-c1